sl-SI: Dodatki v masi za oblikovanje: Konfeti; Penaste kroglice; Bleščice; Svetleče bleščice; Svetleči prah; Kovinski kosmiči; Brez vključkov; Pesek; Cekini; Mrvice; Zvezdice; Drugo
nl: Putty insluitingen: Confetti; Schuimbolletjes; Glitter; Lichtgevende glitter; Lichtgevend poeder; Metallic-vlokken; Geen toevoegingen; Zand; Pailletten; Sprinkels; Stervormen; Overig
pt-BR: Massa inclusões: Confete; Bolinhas de espuma; Glitter; Glitter que brilha no escuro; Pó que brilha no escuro; Flocos metálicos; Sem inclusões; Areia; Lantejoulas; Granulados; Formatos de estrela; Outro
zh-CN: 橡皮泥内含物: 五彩纸屑; 泡沫珠; 闪粉; 夜光闪粉; 夜光粉; 金属箔片; 无内含物; 沙子; 亮片; 糖珠; 星形; 其他
hr-HR: Uključci kita: Konfeti; Pjenaste perlice; Šljokice; Svjetleće šljokice; Svjetleći prah; Metalik ljuskice; Bez dodataka; Pijesak; Ukrasne ljuskice; Mrvice; Zvjezdasti oblici; Ostalo
nb: Inni kittet: Konfetti; Skumkuler; Glitter; Selvlysende glitter; Selvlysende pulver; Metalliske flak; Ingen inneslutninger; Sand; Paljetter; Strøssel; Stjerneformer; Annet
de: Bestandteile der Knete: Konfetti; Schaumstoffperlen; Glitzer; Leuchtglitzer; Leuchtpulver; Metallflocken; Keine Einschlüsse; Sand; Pailletten; Streusel; Sternformen; Sonstige
it: Inclusioni di stucco: Coriandoli; Perline in schiuma; Glitter; Glitter fosforescente; Polvere fosforescente; Scaglie metalliche; Senza inclusioni; Sabbia; Paillette; Zuccherini; Stelline; Altro
en: Putty inclusions: Confetti; Foam beads; Glitter; Glow glitter; Glow powder; Metallic flakes; No inclusions; Sand; Sequins; Sprinkles; Star shapes; Other
ru: Включения в пластилине: Конфетти; Пенопластовые шарики; Блестки; Светящиеся блестки; Светящийся порошок; Металлические хлопья; Без включений; Песок; Пайетки; Декоративная посыпка; Звездочки; Другое
da: Inkluderet i putty: Konfetti; Skumperler; Glimmer; Selvlysende glimmer; Selvlysende pulver; Metalliske flager; Uden fyld; Sand; Pailletter; Krymmel; Stjerneformer; Andet
th: ส่วนผสมเพิ่มเติมในดินปั้น: กระดาษโปรย; เม็ดโฟม; กลิตเตอร์; กลิตเตอร์เรืองแสง; ผงเรืองแสง; แผ่นเกล็ดเมทัลลิก; ไม่มีส่วนผสม; ทราย; เลื่อม; สปริงเคิล; รูปดาว; อื่นๆ
hu: Gyurmaadalékok: Konfetti; Habgyöngyök; Csillám; Világító csillám; Világító por; Fémpelyhek; Adalékok nélkül; Homok; Flitter; Díszítőszórás; Csillag formák; Egyéb
bg-BG: Добавки в пластилина: Конфети; Топчета от пяна; Брокат; Светещ брокат; Светещ прах; Метални люспи; Без включвания; Пясък; Пайети; Пръчици; Звездовидни форми; Друго
ko: 퍼티 함유물: 콘페티; 폼 비즈; 글리터; 야광 글리터; 야광 파우더; 금속 플레이크; 포함물 없음; 모래; 스팽글; 스프링클; 별 모양; 기타
ja: パテの混入物: コンフェッティ; フォームビーズ; グリッター; グローグリッター; グローパウダー; メタリックフレーク; 含有物なし; 砂; スパンコール; スプリンクル; 星型; その他
zh-TW: 黏土內含物: 五彩碎紙; 泡棉珠; 亮片; 夜光亮片; 夜光粉; 金屬碎片; 無添加物; 沙子; 亮片; 彩色糖珠; 星形裝飾; 其他
cs: Příměsi tmelu: Konfety; Pěnové kuličky; Třpytky; Svítící třpytky; Svítící prášek; Kovové vločky; Bez příměsí; Písek; Flitry; Posyp; Tvary hvězdiček; Jiné
tr: Macun iç katkıları: Konfeti; Köpük boncuklar; Sim; Parlayan sim; Parlayan toz; Metalik pullar; Katkısız; Kum; Pul; Granül; Yıldız şekilleri; Diğer
el: Ενσωματωμένα στοιχεία της μάζας: Κομφετί; Χάντρες αφρού; Γκλίτερ; Γκλίτερ που φωσφορίζει; Σκόνη που φωσφορίζει; Μεταλλικές νιφάδες; Χωρίς πρόσθετα; Άμμος; Πούλιες; Τρούφα; Σχήματα αστεριού; Άλλο
vi: Các tạp chất trong chất trám: Giấy vụn nhiều màu; Hạt xốp; Nhũ kim tuyến; Nhũ kim tuyến phát sáng; Bột phát sáng; Vảy kim loại; Không có thành phần thêm vào; Cát; Kim sa; Cốm màu; Hình ngôi sao; Khác
lt-LT: Plastilino priedai: Konfeti; Putplasčio rutuliukai; Blizgučiai; Švytintys blizgučiai; Švytintys milteliai; Metalo dribsniai; Be priedų; Smėlis; Žvyneliai; Pabarstukai; Žvaigždutės; Kita
es: Aditivos de la masilla: Confeti; Cuentas de espuma; Brillantina; Brillantina que brilla en la oscuridad; Polvo que brilla en la oscuridad; Escamas metálicas; Sin inclusiones; Arena; Lentejuelas; Chispas; Formas de estrellas; Otra
pt-PT: Inclusões na massa: Confettis; Bolas de espuma; Purpurinas; Purpurinas luminosas; Pó luminoso; Flocos metálicos; Sem inclusões; Areia; Lantejoulas; Granulado; Formas de estrelas; Outras
fr: Éléments inclus dans la pâte: Confettis; Perles en mousse; Paillettes; Paillettes phosphorescentes; Poudre phosphorescente; Flocons métalliques; Aucune inclusion; Sable; Sequins; Vermicelles; Formes d’étoiles; Autre
fi: Muovailumassan sisältö: Konfetti; Vaahtomuovihelmet; Kimalle; Hohtava kimalle; Hohtojauhe; Metalliset hiutaleet; Ei lisäyksiä; Hiekka; Paljetit; Strösselit; Tähtikuviot; Muu
sk-SK: Prímesi tmelu: Konfety; Penové guľôčky; Trblietky; Svietiace trblietky; Svietiaci prášok; Kovové vločky; Žiadne prímesi; Piesok; Flitre; Posýpka; Tvary hviezd; Iné
sv: Inblandningar i kitt: Konfetti; Skumpärlor; Glitter; Självlysande glitter; Självlysande pulver; Metallflingor; Inga inneslutningar; Sand; Paljetter; Strössel; Stjärnformer; Övrigt
ro-RO: Elemente incluse în slime: Confeti; Mărgele de spumă; Sclipici; Sclipici luminos; Pudră luminoasă; Fulgi metalici; Fără incluziuni; Nisip; Paiete; Stropi decorativi; Forme de stea; Altele
pl: Dodatki w putty: Konfetti; Koraliki piankowe; Brokat; Świecący brokat; Świecący proszek; Płatki metaliczne; Bez dodatków; Piasek; Cekiny; Posypka; W kształcie gwiazdek; Inne